Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-2773
Income tax; partnership; taxable year; return.

Every partnership having part of its income derived from Nebraska sources, determined in accordance with the applicable rules of section 77-2733 as in the case of a nonresident individual, shall make a return for the taxable year setting forth such pertinent information as the Tax Commissioner by rule and regulation may prescribe. Such information may include, but shall not be limited to, all items of income, gain, loss, and deduction, the names and addresses of the individuals whether residents or nonresidents who would be entitled to share in the net income if distributed, and the amount of the distributive share of each individual. Such return shall be filed on or before the date prescribed for filing a federal partnership return. For purposes of this section, taxable year shall mean a year or period which would be a taxable year of the partnership if it were subject to tax under the provisions of the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967.

Laws 1967, c. 487, § 73, p. 1603;

Laws 1987, LB 523, § 28;

Laws 2019, LB512, § 23.